Utah statutes.
20A-11-701.   Campaign financial reporting by corporations -- Filing requirements -- Statement contents.

(1) (a)  Each corporation that has made expenditures for political purposes that total at least $750 during a calendar year shall file a verified financial statement with the lieutenant governor's office:

(i)  on January 10, reporting expenditures as of December 31 of the previous year;

(ii)  seven days before the regular primary election date;

(iii)  on August 31; and

(iv)  seven days before the regular general election date.

(b)  The corporation shall report:

(i)  a detailed listing of all expenditures made since the last statement;

(ii)  for financial statements filed under Subsections (1)(a)(ii) through (iv), all expenditures as of five days before the required filing date of the financial statement; and

(iii)  whether the corporation, including an officer, director, spouse, or person with at least 10% ownership in the corporation:

(A)  has bid since the last financial statement on a contract, as defined in Section 63G-6-103, in excess of $100,000;

(B)  is currently bidding on a contract, as defined in Section 63G-6-103, in excess of $100,000; or

(C)  is a party to a contract, as defined in Section 63G-6-103, in excess of $100,000.

(c)  The corporation need not file a financial statement under this section if the corporation made no expenditures during the reporting period.

(2) The financial statement shall include:

(a)  the name and address of each reporting entity that received an expenditure from the corporation, and the amount of each expenditure;

(b)  the total amount of expenditures disbursed by the corporation; and

(c) a statement by the corporation's treasurer or chief financial officer certifying the accuracy of the financial statement.

